Utah statutes.
62A-15-609.   Responsibility for education of school-aged children at the hospital -- Responsibility for noninstructional services.

(1)  The State Board of Education is responsible for the education of school-aged children committed to the division.

(2)  In order to fulfill its responsibility under Subsection (1), the board may contract with local school districts or other appropriate agencies to provide educational and related administrative services.

(3)  Medical, residential, and other noninstructional services at the state hospital are the responsibility of the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

